Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF3762.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin APPLICABILITY OF INCREASED FUNDING FOR WATER INFRASTRUCTURE GRANTS.new text end new text begin The maximum grant amount for water infrastructure grants under Minnesota Statutes, section 446A.072, subdivision 5a, as set in Laws 2025, First Special Session chapter 15, article 2, section 5, is available to all projects subject to a grant agreement under Minnesota Statutes, section 446A.072, subdivision 5a, as of September 1, 2024, or thereafter. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective the day following final enactment. new text end